Massachusetts, session 194th, H1180.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of Chapter 175M of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition is hereby amended by inserting, in line 74, after the words “health insurance
benefits” the following words- “and life insurance benefits”
of 1